en: Minced beef steak with 5% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf à 5% de matières grasses
hr: Mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 5% masti
lt: Maltos jautienos kepsniai su 5% riebalų

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 5% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 5% de matières grasses
hr: Kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 5% masti
lt: Keptos maltos jautienos kepsniai su 5% riebalų

en: Minced beef steak with 10% fat, minced beef steak with 10% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf à 10% de matières grasses
hr: Mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 10% masti
lt: Maltos jautienos kepsniai su 10% riebalų

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 10% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 10% de matières grasses
hr: Kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 10% masti
lt: Keptos maltos jautienos kepsniai su 10% riebalų

en: Minced beef steak with 15% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf à 15% de matières grasses
hr: Mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 15% masti
lt: Maltos jautienos kepsniai su 15% riebalų

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 15% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 15% de matières grasses
hr: Kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 15% masti
lt: Keptos maltos jautienos kepsniai su 15% riebalų

en: Minced beef steak with 20% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf à 20% de matières grasses
hr: Mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 20% masti
lt: Maltos jautienos kepsniai su 20% riebalų

en: Cooked minced beef steak with 20% fat
fr: Steak haché de bœuf cuit à 20% de matières grasses
hr: Kuhani mljeveni goveđi odrezak sa 20% masti
lt: Keptos maltos jautienos kepsniai su 20% riebalų

en: Grilled beef steaks, Grilled beef steak
fr: Steak de boeuf grillé, Bifteck de boeuf grillé

en: Ground beef preparations, ground beef meat preparations
de: Rinder-Hackfleisch-Zubereitungen, Rinderhackprodukte
es: Preparados de vaca picada
fi: Naudan jauhelihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande bovine hachée, Préparations hachées de viande bovine, préparations hachées de viande bœuf, préparation de viande de bœuf hachée
hr: Pripravci od mljevene govedine
it: Macinato di manzo
lt: Maltos jautienos gaminiai
nl: Gehakt rundvleesproducten

en: Roast veal, Roasted veal, Veal roast
fr: Rôtis de veau, Rôti de veau

en: Cooked veal roast
fr: Rôti de veau cuit

en: Veal stock
de: Kalbsfond
fr: Fond de veau
hr: Teleći temeljac

en: Dashi
xx: Dashi
cs: Daši
eo: Daŝio
hu: Dasi
ja: 出汁
ko: 다시
zh: 出汁

en: Frozen steaks
de: Tiefkühlsteaks, Gefrorene Steaks
fi: pakastetut pihvit
fr: Steaks surgelés, steak surgelé
hr: Smrznuti odresci
it: Bistecche surgelate, Bistecche congelate
lt: Šaldyti kepsniai
nl: Diepvriessteaks
pl: Steki mrożone
zh: 冷冻肉排

en: Frozen meat preparations
de: Gefrorene Fleischprodukte, Gefrorenes Fleisch
es: Preparados de carne congelada
fi: Lihavalmistepakasteet
fr: Préparations de viande surgelées
hr: Smrznuti mesni pripravci
it: Preparazioni surgelate a base di carne
lt: Šaldytos mėsos gaminiai
nl: Bevroren vleesbereidingen

en: Frozen ground steaks
de: Tiefkühl-Hacksteaks, Gefrorene Hacksteaks
fi: pakastetut jauhelihapihvit
fr: Steaks hachés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti mljeveni odresci
it: Hamburger surgelati, Hamburger congelati
lt: Šaldyti maltiniai
nl: Diepvriestartaarsteaks

en: Frozen ground meat preparations
bg: Замразена кайма
de: Gefrohrenes Hackfleisch
es: Preparados de carne picada congelada
fi: pakastetut jauhelihavalmisteet
fr: Préparations de viande hachées surgelées, Préparations hachées de viande surgelées, préparations surgelées de viande hachée
hr: Smrznuti mljeveni mesni pripravci
it: Macinato di carne congelato
lt: Šaldytos maltos mėsos gaminiai
nl: Bevroren vleesproducten

en: Frozen ground beef steaks
fi: Pakastetut naudanjauhelihapihvit
fr: Steaks hachés de bœuf surgelés
hr: Smrznute mljevene goveđe odreske
it: Bistecche di manzo macinate congelate
lt: Šaldyti maltos jautienos kepsniai
nl: Diepvriesrundertartaarsteaks

en: Frozen ground beef preparations
de: Gefrorene Rinderhackprodukte, gefrorenes Rinderhackfleisch
fr: Préparations de viande bovine hachée surgelées, Préparations hachées de viande de bœuf surgelées, préparations de viande de bœuf hachée surgelées, préparations surgelées de viande bovine hachée, préparations hachées surgelées de viande bovine
hr: Smrznuti pripravci od mljevene govedine
lt: Šaldyti maltos jautienos gaminiai
nl: Bevroren gehakte rundvleesproducten